New York, session 2025-2026, S599.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3641 of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 18 to read as follows: 3 18. Farm-to-school food service reimbursement program. For the two 4 thousand twenty-five--two thousand twenty-six school year and thereaft- 5 er, the commissioner shall reimburse districts with school food service 6 programs an additional twenty-five cents per school lunch meal in excess 7 of federal and state rates of reimbursement, provided that such 8 districts have purchased at least thirty percent of their total food 9 products, including both dairy and non-dairy products, for their food 10 service programs from New York state farmers, growers, producers or 11 processors, based upon the number of federally reimbursable meals served 12 to students under such program agreements entered into by the commis- 13 sioner and such districts. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02019-01-5